Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120A.414, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Plan. A school board, including the board of a charter school, may adopt an e-learning day plan after deleted text begin meeting and negotiating with the exclusive representative of the teachers. If a charter school's teachers are not represented by an exclusive representative, the charter school may adopt an e-learning day plan afterdeleted text end consulting with its teachers. The plan must include accommodations for students without Internet access at home and for digital device access for families without the technology or an insufficient amount of technology for the number of children in the household. A school's e-learning day plan must provide accessible options for students with disabilities under chapter 125A. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 179A.03, subdivision 19, is amended to read: Subd. 19. Terms and conditions of employment. "Terms and conditions of employment" means the hours of employment, the compensation therefor including fringe benefits except retirement contributions or benefits other than employer payment of, or contributions to, premiums for group insurance coverage of retired employees or severance pay, staffing ratios, and the employer's personnel policies affecting the working conditions of the employees. In the case of professional employees the term does not mean educational policies of a school district. "Terms and conditions of employment" is subject to section 179A.07. In the case of school employees, "terms and conditions of employment" deleted text begin includes adult-to-student ratios in classrooms, student testing, and student-to-personneldeleted text end new text begin does not include staffingnew text end ratios. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for collective bargaining agreements effective July 1, 2025, and thereafter. new text end